Illinois, session 104th, SB741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Electric Supplier Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 30/1)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 401)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Electric Supplier Act".9(Source: Laws 1965, p. 1206.)